Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.110

Adverse action based on report—Procedure—Notice.

If a person takes an adverse action with respect to a consumer that is based, in whole or in part, on information contained in a consumer report, the person shall:

(1) Provide written notice of the adverse action to the consumer, except verbal notice may be given by a person in an adverse action involving a business regulated by the Washington utilities and transportation commission if such verbal notice does not impair a consumer's ability to obtain a credit report without charge under RCW 19.182.100(2); and

(2) Provide the consumer with the name, address, and telephone number of the consumer reporting agency that furnished the report to the person.

[ 2012 c 41 s 4; 1993 c 476 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—2012 c 41: See note following RCW 59.18.257.